Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201848-191
Time; how computed.

Notwithstanding any more general or special law respecting
the subject matter hereof, whenever the last day of the period within which
a party to an action may file any document or pleading with
the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court, or take any other action with respect
to a claim for compensation, falls on a Saturday, a Sunday, any day on which
the compensation court is closed by order of the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Court, or any day declared by statutory enactment or proclamation of the Governor
to be a holiday, the next following day, which is not a Saturday, a Sunday,
a day on which the compensation court is closed by order of the Chief Justice
of the Supreme Court, or a day declared by such enactment or proclamation
to be a holiday, shall be deemed to be the last day for filing any such document or pleading or taking any such other
action with respect to a claim for compensation.

Laws 1955, c. 187, § 1, p. 535;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 120;

Laws 2003, LB 760, § 16;

Laws 2011, LB151, § 14.

The plain language of this section is broad enough to include not only transactions between a party and the court, but also transactions between the parties. Herrington v. P.R. Ventures, 279 Neb. 754, 781 N.W.2d 196 (2010).